Utah statutes.
78B-6-1110.   Prior acts or threats of violence -- Protection of witnesses.

At the time of application for abatement of the nuisance by eviction pursuant to Sections 78B-6-1108 and 78B-6-1109, if proof of the existence of the nuisance depends, in whole or in part, upon the affidavits of witnesses who are not peace officers, upon a showing of prior threats of violence or acts of violence by any defendant or other person, the court may issue orders to protect those witnesses, including, nondisclosure of the name, address, or any other information which may identify those witnesses.

